Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 23. Virginia Chesapeake Bay Partnership Council.

§§ 30-184,
30-185.

Repealed by Acts 2001, c. 577.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, c. 577, repealed former Chapter 43 (§§ 9-334 and 9-335) of Title 9, from which these sections were derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2001, c. 577 had been given effect in these sections, which are deemed repealed by Acts 2001, c. 577.

Former §§ 9-334 and 9-335, establishing the Virginia Chesapeake Bay Partnership Council, were derived from Acts 1995, cc. 501, 528; 1996, c. 633.